italian.aff
# particelle pronominali su part. pass.
flag *X:

    # flag *X:
    # eccellere
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,solo
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sola
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,soli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sole
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sone
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,salo
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sala
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sali
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sale
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sane
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,silo
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sila
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sili
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sile
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sine
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,selo
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sela
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,seli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sele
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sene
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,somi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,soti
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sogli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,soci
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sovi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sosi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sami
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sati
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sagli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,saci
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,savi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sasi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,simi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,siti
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sigli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sici
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sivi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sisi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,semi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,seti
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,segli
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,seci
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sevi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sesi
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sovene
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,savene
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sivene
    c e l l e r e   >    -lere,sevene

    # flag *X:
    # prudere
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritolo
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritola
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritoli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritole
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritone
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritalo
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritala
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritali
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritale
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritane
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritilo
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritila
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritili
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritile
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritine
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritelo
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritela
    u d e r e       >    -dere,riteli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritele
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritene
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritomi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritoti
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritogli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritoci
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritovi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritosi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritami
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritati
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritagli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritaci
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritavi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritasi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritimi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,rititi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritigli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritici
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritivi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritisi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritemi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,riteti
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritegli
    u d e r e       >    -dere,riteci
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritevi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritesi
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritovene
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritavene
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritivene
    u d e r e       >    -dere,ritevene

    # flag *X:
    # diffrangere, rifrangere
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttolo
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttola
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttoli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttole
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttone
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttalo
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttala
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttali
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttale
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttane
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttilo
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttila
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttili
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttile
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttine
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttelo
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttela
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,tteli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttele
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttene
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttomi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttoti
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttogli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttoci
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttovi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttosi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttami
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttati
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttagli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttaci
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttavi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttasi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttimi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttiti
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttigli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttici
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttivi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttisi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttemi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,tteti
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttegli
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,tteci
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttevi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttesi
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttovene
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttavene
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttivene
    a n g e r e     >    -ngere,ttevene

    # flag *X:
    # divellere, svellere
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tolo
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tola
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,toli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tole
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tone
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,talo
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tala
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tali
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tale
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tane
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tilo
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tila
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tili
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tile
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tine
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,telo
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tela
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,teli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tele
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tene
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tomi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,toti
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,togli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,toci
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tovi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tosi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tami
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tati
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tagli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,taci
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tavi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tasi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,timi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,titi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tigli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tici
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tivi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tisi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,temi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,teti
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tegli
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,teci
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tevi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tesi
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tovene
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tavene
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tivene
    v e l l e r e   >    -lere,tevene

    # flag *X:
    # chiedere, richiedere
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stolo
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stola
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stoli
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stole
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stone
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stalo
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stala
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stali
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stale
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stane
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stilo
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stila
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stili
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stile
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stine
    i e d e r e     >    -dere,stelo
