italian.dict
affiggere/ABDGKOUXY1
astringere/ABDGKOUXY1
chiedere/ABDGKOUXY1
configgere/ABDGKOUXY1
contendere/ABCGKOUXY1
contundere/ABCGKOUXY1
convergere/ABDGKOUXY1
cospargere/ABDGKOUXY1
costringere/ABDGKOUXY1
crocifiggere/ABDGKOUXY1
diffrangere/ABCGKOUXY1
disattendere/ABCGKOUXY1
distendere/ABCGKOUXY1
divellere/ABDGKOUXY1
eccellere/ABDGKOUXY1
emergere/ABDGKOUXY1
espellere/ABDGKOUXY1
immergere/ABDGKOUXY1w
prefiggere/ABDGKOUXY1
pretendere/ABCGKOUXY1
prevedere/ABCGKOSUVXY1
profondere/ABCGKOUXY1
prudere/ABCGKOUXY1
repellere/ABDGKOUXY1
restringere/ABDGKOUXY1
richiedere/ABDGKOUXY1
riemergere/ABDGKOUXY1
riespellere/ABDGKOUXY1
rifiggere/ABDGKOUXY1
risommergere/ABDGKOUXY1
ristringere/ABDGKOUXY1
sommergere/ABDGKOUXY1
sottintendere/ABCGKOUXY1
spargere/ABDGKOUXY1
stringere/ABDGKOUXY1
svellere/ABDGKOUXY1
tergere/ABDGKOUXY1
trasfondere/ABCGKOUXY1
